Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 6 Disposal of Solid Wastes and Other Refuse
Subchapter 6
— Solid Waste Management and Recycling Fund Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 1993, No. 1127, § 7: Apr. 13, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that some areas of the state are facing critical shortages of solid waste disposal capacity due to the difficulties in siting landfill facilities at the local level. It is found that the authority granted to municipalities and counties to adopt more restrictive standards for the location, design, construction, and maintenance of solid waste disposal sites and facilities than those adopted by the federal, state and regional laws, rules, regulations, and orders, has exacerbated and attenuated this crises and could thwart or jeopardize the purposes of Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 and its efforts to protect the public health and the state's environmental quality by establishing regional solid waste management and planning. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 179, § 38: Feb. 17, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 10 of the First Extraordinary Session of 1995 abolished the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and in its place established the House Interim Committee and Senate Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; that various sections of the Arkansas Code refer to the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and should be corrected to refer to the House and Senate Interim Committees on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to make the laws compatible as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2012, No. 283, § 15: July 1, 2012. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2012 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2012 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2012.”

Acts 2013, No. 1202, § 49: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2013 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2013 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-6-601. Title.

This subchapter may be known and cited as the “Solid Waste Management and Recycling Fund Act”.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 849, § 1; 1989, No. 934, § 1.

8-6-602. Legislative findings and intent — Duties of division — Construction.

The General Assembly finds that the solid waste needs of the state are not being met in an efficient, cost-efficient, and environmentally sound manner. The current reliance upon localized landfills is threatening to add Arkansas to those states experiencing solid waste management crises.

The General Assembly concludes that, to the extent practicable, regional solid waste management systems should be developed which address solid waste needs in the context of cooperation and shared resources.

The General Assembly finds that recycling glass, plastic, cans, paper, and other materials will reduce the state's reliance upon landfills.

Additionally, other solid waste reduction activities will help reduce the state's dependence on landfills, including:

Using waste items as raw materials in a production process, such as adding shingles to asphalt mix for paving;

Using waste items to produce an end product without recycling, such as returning wood chips to citizens as mulch;

Using waste items as fuel, such as burning wood chips or tire chips in a waste-to-fuel process; or

Other activities as approved by the Division of Environmental Quality.

The waste stream reduction activities described in subdivision (c)(2) of this section also curb littering, illegal dumping, and abate the environmental risks caused by current solid waste practices.

The General Assembly therefore mandates that recycling shall be integrated as a component of any solid waste management plan required under the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq., and that these recycling plans shall be implemented under the terms of this subchapter.

The division and the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall promulgate and implement policies, rules, and procedures for administering the terms of this subchapter.

The terms and obligations of this subchapter shall be liberally construed so as to achieve remedial intent.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 849, § 2; 1989, No. 934, § 2; 2011, No. 819, § 1; 2013, No. 1333, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 543;
2019, No. 910, §§ 2623, 2624.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment inserted present (c)(2) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and, in (c)(3), added “The waste stream reduction activities described in subdivision (c)(2) of this section also” and inserted “illegal dumping.”

The 2013 amendment rewrote (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (c)(2)(D); and substituted “division” for “department” in (d).

8-6-603. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

[Repealed.]

“Landfill” means all landfills permitted under the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq., except those permitted landfills operated by a regulated public utility for ash generated by the combustion of coal to produce electric energy;

“Permittee” means any individual, corporation, company, firm, partnership, association, trust, local solid waste authority, institution, county, city, town, or municipal authority or trust, venture, or other legal entity holding a solid waste disposal permit as provided in the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq.;

“Recycling” means the systematic collection, sorting, decontamination, and return of waste materials to commerce as commodities for use or exchange;

“Solid waste” means any garbage or refuse, sludge from a wastewater treatment plant, water supply treatment plant, or air pollution control facility, and other discarded material, including solid, liquid, semisolid, or contained gaseous material resulting from industrial, commercial, mining, and agricultural operations, and from community activities, but does not include solid or dissolved materials in domestic sewage or solid or dissolved materials in irrigation return flows or industrial discharges that are point sources subject to permit under 33 U.S.C. § 1342, or source material, special nuclear material, or by-product material as defined by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, Pub. L. No. 83-703;

“Solid waste disposal permit” means a permit issued by the State of Arkansas under the provisions of the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq., for the construction and operation of a landfill waste disposal facility;

“Solid waste management” means the management of, but is not limited to, the storage, collection, transfer, transportation, treatment, utilization, processing, and final disposal of solid waste, including, but not limited to, the prevention, reduction, or recycling of wastes;

“Solid waste management plan” means a plan which is developed according to the provisions of the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq., and guidelines of the Division of Environmental Quality, and which is subject to approval by the division;

“Solid waste reduction activities” means other activities that divert materials from landfills for reuse, including without limitation:

Using waste items as raw materials in a production process, such as adding shingles to asphalt mix for paving;

Using waste items to produce an end product without recycling, such as returning wood chips to citizens as mulch;

Using waste items as fuel, such as burning wood chips or tire chips in a waste-to-fuel process; or

Other activities as approved by the division; and

“Transporter” or “solid waste transporter” means any individual, corporation, company, firm, partnership, association, trust, local solid waste authority, institution, county, city, town, or municipal authority or trust, venture, or other legal entity transporting solid waste within the state that is to be disposed of outside the state.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 849, § 3; 1989, No. 934, § 3; 1991, No. 755, § 1; 1993, No. 1127, § 3; 1995, No. 511, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 69; 2011, No. 819, § 2; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2625-2627.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment inserted present (10) and redesignated the remaining subdivision accordingly.

The 2019 amendment repealed (2); in (9), substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for the first occurrence of “department” and “division” for the second occurrence of “department”; and substituted “division” for “department” in (10)(D).

U.S. Code.

The Atomic Energy Act of 1954, referred to in (6), is codified primarily as 42 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq.

8-6-604. Recycling plans and implementation.

Unless otherwise excused by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission pursuant to the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq., each governmental entity which is required to submit or has submitted a solid waste management plan pursuant to § 8-6-211 shall produce, by July 1, 1991, a solid waste management plan which proposes the establishment of recycling programs and facilities. The plan shall be subject to review and approval by the Division of Environmental Quality.

Pursuant to established procedures, the division may initiate enforcement actions against governmental entities for failure to abide by the requirements of subsection (a) of this section. Enforcement sanctions may include, but are not limited to, denial, discontinuation, or reimbursement of grant funds awarded pursuant to any programs administered by the division.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 849, § 4; 1989, No. 934, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 2628.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” twice in (b).

8-6-605. Solid Waste Management and Recycling Fund.

There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to be known as the “Solid Waste Management and Recycling Fund”.

The fund shall be administered by the Division of Environmental Quality, which shall authorize distributions and administrative expenditures from the fund under this subchapter for solid waste management and recycling programs.

In addition to all moneys appropriated by the General Assembly to the fund, there shall be deposited into the fund all landfill disposal fees collected pursuant to §§ 8-6-606 and 8-6-607, United States Government moneys designated to enter the fund, any moneys received by the state as a gift or donation to the fund, and all interest earned upon money deposited into the fund.

No more than twenty percent (20%) of the moneys received annually into the fund shall be used by the division for:

The administration of a solid waste management and recycling program;

The administration of a computer and electronic equipment recycling program under § 8-6-613; and

Solid waste management compliance and enforcement activities at landfills and open dumps.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 849, § 5; 1989, No. 934, § 5; 2007, No. 512, § 1; 2013, No. 1333, § 2; 2017, No. 624, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2629, 2630.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 624, § 9, provided: “Distribution of funds from landfill disposal fees.

“(a)(1)

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall determine the total moneys available on the day before the effective date of this act [August 1, 2017] at 11:59 p.m. that were collected under § 8-6-612 [repealed] for computer and electronic equipment recycling programs.

“(2)

The moneys available under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be used to fund computer and electronic equipment recycling programs under Arkansas Code § 8-6-613(c) until all moneys are distributed as provided under this subsection.

“(3)(A)

The use of any interest earnings or investment earnings on the moneys available under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall not be restricted to computer and electronic equipment recycling programs after the effective date of this act [August 1, 2017].

“(B)

The interest earnings and investment earnings on the moneys available under this subsection shall be used as provided under § 8-6-605.

“(4)(A)

For each fiscal year, two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) of the moneys available under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be added to the distribution of funding to regional solid waste management districts under Arkansas Code § 8-6-615.

“(B)

When the balance of the moneys allocated under subdivision (a)(1) of this section is less than two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) for a fiscal year, all of the available moneys remaining in the fund shall be the last moneys used to supplement the distribution to the regional solid waste management districts under § 8-6-615 for that fiscal year.

“(5)

For each fiscal year, the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality shall determine the amount of the moneys allocated under subdivision (a)(4) of this section that are included in each regional solid waste management district's fund distribution under § 8-6-615 and provide that information to the regional solid waste management districts.

“(6)(A)

Except as otherwise provided under subdivision (a)(6)(B) of this section, each regional solid waste management district shall use the moneys received under subdivision (a)(5) of this section for computer and electronic equipment recycling programs.

“(B)

Moneys received under this section by a regional solid waste management district but not needed for computer and electronic equipment recycling may be used for another recycling project operated by the regional solid waste management district only if the regional solid waste management board that governs a regional solid waste management district certifies that the funds are not needed for the approved computer and electronic equipment recycling program.

“(b)

This section expires after the final distribution of the moneys allocated under subdivision (a)(4)(B) of this section to the regional solid waste management districts.”

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment added the (a)(1), (a)(2) and (a)(3) designations, and added (b).

The 2013 amendment, in (a)(2), substituted “distributions” for “grants” and “under” for “according to the provisions of”; and substituted “twenty percent (20%)” for “twenty five percent (25%)” in (a)(4).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (a)(1) through (a)(4) as present (a) through (d); in (a), substituted “There is” for “The Solid Waste Management and Recycling Fund is” and added “a trust fund to be known as the ‘Solid Waste Management and Recycling Fund’”; added “for solid waste management and recycling programs” in (b); deleted “all moneys reimbursed to the department pursuant to § 8-6-610” preceding “federal” in (c); inserted (d)(2); deleted former (b); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b); and substituted “division” for “department” in (d).

Cross References.

Solid Waste Management and Recycling Fund, § 19-5-961.

8-6-606. Landfill disposal fees.

Except as provided in subsection (c) or subsection (e) of this section, there is imposed on each landfill permittee a landfill disposal fee of twenty-five cents (25¢) for each uncompacted cubic yard of solid waste and forty-five cents (45¢) for each compacted cubic yard of solid waste received at the landfill.

If a landfill permittee is required or chooses to operate on a weight basis, the landfill disposal fee shall be one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) for each one (1) ton (2,000 lbs.) of solid waste received at the landfill.

Except as provided in subsections (a) and (c) of this section, for all solid waste generated and transported within the state but to be disposed of outside the state, there is imposed on each such solid waste transporter a solid waste transportation fee of twenty-five cents (25¢) for each uncompacted cubic yard of solid waste and forty-five cents (45¢) for each compacted cubic yard of solid waste transported.

If a solid waste transporter chooses to operate on a weight basis, the solid waste transportation fee shall be one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) for each ton of solid waste transported in the state.

For those permitted landfills where a private industry bears the expense of operating and maintaining the landfill solely for the disposal of wastes generated by the industry, there is imposed on each landfill permittee a landfill disposal fee of ten cents (10¢) for each uncompacted cubic yard of solid waste and twenty cents (20¢) for each compacted cubic yard of solid waste received at the landfill.

If the landfill permittee chooses to operate on a weight basis, the landfill disposal fee under this subsection shall be fifty cents (50¢) for each ton of solid waste received at the landfill.

By January 1, 2004, all permitted facilities identified by rule of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission as Class 1 and Class 3C landfills, except those permitted landfills that shall comply with closure requirements before January 1, 2005, shall install scales and commence weighing all solid waste received at the landfill.

This requirement may be satisfied by utilizing an alternative weighing system approved by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality.

Class 1 and Class 3C landfills shall be required to weigh all loads in excess of one (1) ton (2,000 lbs.), unless otherwise authorized in writing by the Division of Environmental Quality. This provision authorizes Class 1 and Class 3C landfills to estimate weights for residential and other similar loads weighing less than one (1) ton (2,000 lbs.).

Class 1 and Class 3C landfills shall install and operate scales for the purpose of weighing solid waste received at the landfill and shall maintain and operate the scales in accordance with the United States Department of Agriculture standards.

Except as provided in subdivisions (d)(1) and (2) of this section, beginning January 1, 2004:

All quarterly reports required by this subchapter to be submitted by Class 1 and Class 3C landfill permittees to the division shall accurately state the total weight of solid waste received at the landfill, and the total weight of solid waste received at the landfill shall be based upon the recorded weight scale measurements; and

The recorded weight scale measurements of solid waste received at Class 1 and Class 3C landfills shall be used to calculate the solid waste disposal fees payable to the division by Class 1 and Class 3C landfill permittees.

Solid waste collected during the annual Keep Arkansas Beautiful and Keep America Beautiful campaigns that are sponsored by the Keep Arkansas Beautiful Commission is exempt from the landfill disposal fee under this section.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 849, § 6; 1989, No. 934, § 6; 1991, No. 754, § 1; 1993, No. 1127, § 3; 2001, No. 217, §§ 1, 2; 2003, No. 1337, § 1; 2009, No. 189, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 315, § 544; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2631-2633.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted “or (e)” in (a)(1); and added (e).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (d)(1)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” throughout (d).

8-6-607. Collection of fees.

On or before January 15, April 15, July 15, and October 15 of each year, each landfill permittee and each solid waste transporter shall:

Submit to the Division of Environmental Quality a quarterly report that accurately states the total weight or volume of solid waste received at the landfill or transported out of state during the quarter just completed; and

Pay to the division the full amount of disposal and transportation fees imposed and collected under this subchapter for the preceding quarter.

Except as provided in subdivisions (b)(2) and (3) of this section, the disposal and transportation fees collected under this section shall be special revenues and deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the Solid Waste Management and Recycling Fund for administrative support of the Compliance Advisory Panel.

Twenty-five percent (25%) of the disposal fees collected under subsection (a) of this section from landfills in which a private industry bears the expense of operating and maintaining the landfill solely for the disposal of wastes generated by the private industry shall be deposited quarterly into the Marketing Recyclables Program Fund.

Except for the disposal fees deposited into the Marketing Recyclables Program Fund under subdivision (b)(2) of this section, before disbursing moneys to the regional solid waste management boards, the division shall deposit the following moneys into the following funds each fiscal year:

One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) into the Crime Information System Fund to be used exclusively for the scrap metal logbook program; and

Three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) into the Arkansas Unpaved Roads Program Fund.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 849, § 7; 1989, No. 934, § 7; 1991, No. 755, § 2; 1993, No. 1127, § 3; 1995, No. 511, § 2; 2012, No. 283, §
10; 2013, No. 1202, § 45; 2017, No. 1067, § 2; 2019, No. 695, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2634, 2635.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 695, § 3, provided: “This act applies to annual disbursements under § 8-6-607 beginning in fiscal year 2020.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 2635, amended subdivision (4)(B) of this section to replace “department” with “division”. However, Acts 2019, No 695, § 1, specifically repealed this subdivision.

Amendments.

The 2012 amendment substituted “under” for “pursuant to” in the introductory language and in (3); substituted “subdivisions (4) and (5)” for “subdivision (4)” in (3); and added (5).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (5).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Compliance Advisory Panel” for “State Marketing Board for Recyclables” at the end of (3); substituted “Marketing Recyclables Program Fund” for “Marketing Board Fund” throughout (4) and (5); and, in (4)(B), substituted “panel” for “board” and “panel's” for “board's”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 695 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (2) and (4)(B).

Cross References.

Crime Information System Fund, § 19-5-1011.

Marketing Recyclables Program Fund, § 19-6-471.

8-6-608. Penalties.

Failure of the permittee or solid waste transporter to pay the fees assessed by the Division of Environmental Quality provides grounds for administrative or civil enforcement action. Sanctions may include civil penalties as provided in the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq., or the revocation of the solid waste disposal or solid waste transporter permit.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 849, § 8; 1989, No. 934, § 8; 1993, No. 1127, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 2636.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-6-609. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning a grant program for the development of solid waste management plans, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1333, §
3. The former section was derived from Acts 1989, No. 849, § 9; 1989, No. 934, § 9; 1991, No. 749, § 5; 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 2; 1993, No. 1030, § 1; 1995, No. 463, § 1; 1999, No. 428, § 1; 2001, No. 70, § 1; 2003, No. 1027, § 1; 2005, No. 1325, § 1; 2011, No. 819, §§ 3, 4.

8-6-610. Rules.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may adopt reasonable rules necessary to implement this subchapter, including without limitation:

Collecting fees; and

Setting priorities for the administration of this subchapter.

The rules shall be reviewed by the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 849, § 10; 1989, No. 934, § 10; 1991, No. 749, § 6; 1997, No. 179, § 4; 2001, No. 70, § 2; 2011, No. 819, § 5; 2013, No. 1333, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 545.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor” for “House and Senate Interim Committees on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor” in present (b)(1)(A); deleted “or incinerators” following “landfills” in (b)(2)(C); deleted “Thirty (30) days prior to submitting a grant application to the department” at the beginning of present (b)(2)(E)(i); inserted (b)(2)(E)(ii); and rewrote (b)(2)(E)(iii).

The 2013 amendment deleted “Conditions imposed upon grant recipients” in the section heading; deleted (a)(2) and (a)(4) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; deleted (b)(1)(B), (b)(2) and (c); and inserted “and regulations” in (b).

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” in the section heading; and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the introductory language of (a), and in (b).

8-6-611. Computation of fees.

For the purpose of determining landfill disposal or transportation fees under this subchapter, the landfill permittees and solid waste transporters shall use the dry weight basis in determining the fee for disposal or transportation of ash.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 751, § 5; 1993, No. 1127, § 3.

8-6-612. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning landfill disposal fees to support a computer and electronic equipment recycling program, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 624, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 2007, No. 512, § 2; 2009, No. 189, §§ 3, 4; 2011, No. 602, § 1.

8-6-613. Computer and electronic equipment recycling program.

A program for the recycling of computer and electronic equipment is created.

The General Assembly finds that:

Computer and electronic equipment solid waste are among the fastest growing and most toxic segments of Arkansas's solid waste stream; and

There are recycling options to address this problem, and Arkansas solid waste districts and local governments and their delegated authorities and agents should develop solid waste management plans, programs, and facilities that integrate computer and electronic equipment recycling as a functional part of the solid waste management system.

Each regional solid waste management board that is required to submit or has submitted a regional solid waste management plan under § 8-6-1904 or a solid waste management plan developed under the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq., and receives funding under this subchapter shall operate a solid waste management system that includes a computer and electronic equipment recycling program.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may adopt rules necessary to implement an effective computer and electronic equipment recycling program.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 512, § 2; 2017, No. 624, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 546.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 624, § 9, provided: “Distribution of funds from landfill disposal fees.

“(a)(1)

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall determine the total moneys available on the day before the effective date of this act [August 1, 2017] at 11:59 p.m. that were collected under § 8-6-612 [repealed] for computer and electronic equipment recycling programs.

“(2)

The moneys available under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be used to fund computer and electronic equipment recycling programs under Arkansas Code § 8-6-613(c) until all moneys are distributed as provided under this subsection.

“(3)(A)

The use of any interest earnings or investment earnings on the moneys available under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall not be restricted to computer and electronic equipment recycling programs after the effective date of this act [August 1, 2017].

“(B)

The interest earnings and investment earnings on the moneys available under this subsection shall be used as provided under § 8-6-605.

“(4)(A)

For each fiscal year, two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) of the moneys available under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be added to the distribution of funding to regional solid waste management districts under Arkansas Code § 8-6-615.

“(B)

When the balance of the moneys allocated under subdivision (a)(1) of this section is less than two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) for a fiscal year, all of the available moneys remaining in the fund shall be the last moneys used to supplement the distribution to the regional solid waste management districts under § 8-6-615 for that fiscal year.

“(5)

For each fiscal year, the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality shall determine the amount of the moneys allocated under subdivision (a)(4) of this section that are included in each regional solid waste management district's fund distribution under § 8-6-615 and provide that information to the regional solid waste management districts.

“(6)(A)

Except as otherwise provided under subdivision (a)(6)(B) of this section, each regional solid waste management district shall use the moneys received under subdivision (a)(5) of this section for computer and electronic equipment recycling programs.

“(B)

Moneys received under this section by a regional solid waste management district but not needed for computer and electronic equipment recycling may be used for another recycling project operated by the regional solid waste management district only if the regional solid waste management board that governs a regional solid waste management district certifies that the funds are not needed for the approved computer and electronic equipment recycling program.

“(b)

This section expires after the final distribution of the moneys allocated under subdivision (a)(4)(B) of this section to the regional solid waste management districts.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted present (c); redesignated former (c) as (d); and substituted “regulations” for “reasonable rules” in (d).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d).

8-6-614. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning disposal fees effective date, was repealed by Acts 2015, No. 1176,
§ 1. The section was derived from Acts 2007, No. 512, § 2.